Utah statutes.
17D-1-504.   Pledge of revenues to pay for bonds.
Bonds may be payable from and secured by the pledge of all or any specified
part of:
(1)  the revenues to be derived by the special service district from providing
its services and from the operation of its facilities and other properties;
(2)  sales and use taxes, property taxes, and other taxes;
(3)  federal, state, or local grants;
(4)  in the case of special assessment bonds, the special assessments pledged
to repay the special assessment bonds; and
(5)  other money legally available to the special service district.
